Connecticut, session 2026, SB00082.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to (1) eliminate all application
fees charged by state occupational licensing boards, and (2) cap the
amount the state may charge for an occupational license at one hundred
dollars.